Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2732.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 43 O.S. 2021, Section 105, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 105. A. A proceeding for dissolution of marriage, an
annulment of a marriage, or a legal separation shall be titled "In
re the Marriage of _______ and ______".
B. The initial pleading in all proceedings under this title
shall be denominated a petition. The person filing the petition
shall be called the petitioner. A responsive pleading shall be
denominated a response. The person filing the responsive pleading
shall be called the respondent. Other pleadings shall be
Req. No. 12440 Page 1

deno minated as provided in the Rules of Civil Procedure, except as
otherwise provided in this section.
C. The petition must be verified as true, by the affidavit of
the petitioner.
D. A summons may issue thereon, and shall be served, or
publication made, as in other civil cases.
E. Wherever it occurs in this title or in any other title of
the Oklahoma Statutes or in any forms or court documents prepared
pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Statutes, the term
"divorce" shall mean and be deemed to refer to a "dissolution of
marriage" unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires.
F. Standard forms sufficient to meet the statutory requirements
of this section and any other relevant sections in this title to
complete a divorce proceeding shall be prescribed by the Oklahoma
Bar Association in plain and understandable language, where
possible. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall provide
public access to the forms by providing a link on the Oklahoma State
Courts Network. Such standardized forms shall not be required to be
used in any proceeding.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12440 CMA 02/06/25


Req. No. 12440 Page 2